Utah statutes.
17-53-228.   Administrative hearings and procedures.

(1)  A county may adopt an ordinance establishing an administrative hearing process to review and decide matters relating to the violation, enforcement, or administration of a county civil ordinance, including an ordinance related to the following:

(a)  a building code;

(b)  planning and zoning;

(c)  animal control;

(d)  licensing;

(e)  health and safety;

(f)  county employment; or

(g)  sanitation.

(2)  An ordinance adopted in accordance with Subsection (1) shall provide appropriate due process protections for a party participating in an administrative hearing.

(3)  An administrative hearing held in accordance with an ordinance described in Subsection (1) may be conducted by an administrative law judge.

(4)  A county may not impose a civil penalty and adjudication for the violation of a county moving traffic ordinance.



Enacted by Chapter 133, 2013 General Session

